Hawaii, session 2026, HB2090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 586-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows: "(g) If the court denies a temporary restraining order, the court may order upon the oral or written request of the respondent or the person to be restrained that the petition record be withheld from public inspection; provided that the record shall remain accessible to law enforcement officers without a court order." SECTION 2.  Section 586-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  If the court denies a protective order or extended protective order, the court may order upon the oral or written request of the respondent that the protective order or extended protective order petition record be withheld from public inspection; provided that the record shall remain accessible to law enforcement officers without a court order." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request